Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.090

Joint school districts—Levy of tax.

The amount of tax to be levied upon the taxable property of that part of a joint school district lying in one county shall be in such ratio to the whole amount levied upon the property in the entire joint district as the assessed valuation of the property lying in such county bears to the assessed valuation of the property in the entire joint district.

[ 1983 c 56 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 98; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 135; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.290. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 31; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-50; prior: (i) 1925 ex.s. c 77 s 10; RRS s 4753-10. (ii) 1927 c 286 s 2; RRS s 4753-11. Formerly RCW 28A.315.430, 28A.57.290, 28.57.290.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.